Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Chapter 24 Estrays

Cross references. —

As to requiring stock running at large to be branded, see §

11-20-102

.

As to swine, goats or elk running at large, see §

11-26-101

.

As to requiring legislature to provide for the protection of livestock and stock owners, see art. 19, § 1, Wyo. Const.

As to taking of bull from open range for purpose of obtaining service therefrom, see §

6-3-408

.

As to powers of cities and towns relative to animals running at large, see title 15.

As to livestock roaming at large in Hot Springs state park, see §

36-8-316

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

4 Am. Jur. 2d Animals §§ 48 to 77.

Contributory negligence as a defense to a cause of action based upon violation of a statute imposing duty upon keeper of animals, 10 ALR2d 853.

Owner's liability, under legislation forbidding domestic animals to run at large on highways, as dependent on negligence, 34 ALR2d 1285.

Constitutionality of statute or ordinance providing for destruction of abandoned animals, 56 ALR2d 1024.

Constitutionality of statute or ordinance providing for destruction of dogs running at large, 56 ALR2d 1024.

Liability for injury to vehicle or person riding therein by animal at large in street or highway, 59 ALR2d 1328.

Injunction to restrain repeated or continuing trespasses by livestock and fowl, 60 ALR2d 310.

Liability of owner or bailor of horse for injury by horse to hirer or bailee thereof, 6 ALR4th 358.

Liability of owner or operator of vehicle for damage to motor vehicle or injury to person riding therein resulting from collision with domestic animal at large in street or highway, 21 ALR4th 159.

Liability for killing or injuring, by motor vehicle, of livestock or fowl on highway, 55 ALR4th 822.

3A C.J.S. Animals §§ 123 to 169.

§ 11-24-101.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Animal” means any bovine animal, horse, mule, ass or sheep;

“Estray” means any animal found running at large upon public or private lands, fenced or unfenced, in Wyoming whose owner is unknown in the territory where found or the owner of which cannot with reasonable diligence be found, or that is branded with two (2) or more brands the ownership of which is disputed, neither party holding a bill of sale. An estray includes any animal for which there is no sufficient proof of ownership found upon inspection;

“Range” means all unfenced lands or fenced allotments in Wyoming of a grazing nature. Range includes all highways outside of private enclosures and used by the public whether formally dedicated to the public or not;

“Disposal” means to sell, send to slaughter or destroy the animal;

"Livestock" means as defined in W.S. 11-20-101(a)(iv);

“This act” means W.S.

11-24-101

through

11-24-115

.

History.

Laws 1913, ch. 125, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 3179; R.S. 1931, § 67-401; C.S. 1945, § 56-1801; Laws 1957, ch. 173, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 11-498, 11-499; Laws 1961, ch. 46, § 50; W.S. 1977, §§

11-30-101

, 11-30-102; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2010, ch. 80, § 1; 2013 ch. 13, § 1, § 1, effective February 12, 2013.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added present (a)(iv) and (a)(v), and redesignated former (a)(iv) as (a)(vi).

The 2013 amendment,

added the language “unless the applications are part of a collection of related applications or appropriations from the same source of supply for the same or similar use where the total use or transfer outside the state exceeds one thousand (1,000) acre-feet per year in aggregate” and added the last sentence in (b).

Laws 2013, ch. 13, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved February 12, 2013.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Cited

in

Stanko v. Mahar, 419 F.3d 1107, 2005 U.S. App. LEXIS 17323 (2005).

§ 11-24-102.
Taking
up estrays; generally.

No person shall take up and retain possession of an estray except in the county where he resides and is a freeholder, nor unless the animal is found on lands owned, leased, or controlled by him or his duly authorized agents. When any person takes up an estray he shall immediately notify an inspector who shall inspect or cause to be inspected the estray for brands and other evidence of ownership and make a diligent effort to learn or determine ownership of the animal. The inspector may cause any estray to be held for not more than ten (10) days after the inspection to enable him to complete his investigation of ownership. If the estray is claimed by an owner, the bill for feed and care incurred by the inspector must be paid by the claimant. If the rightful owner cannot be found, or when found, refuses or fails to pay the charges for feed and care of the estray, the inspector shall order the estray be disposed of. Incurred charges for feed and care by the inspector and reasonable shipping and disposal expense shall be paid from the proceeds of the disposal. The net proceeds, if any, received from the disposal of the estray after deduction of authorized expenses, shall be forwarded to the estray fund of the board or its agency. The board or agency shall hold the proceeds in a special fund known as estray fund until paid to the rightful owner of the estray or otherwise disposed of according to law.

If the proceeds of the disposal of any estray are insufficient to pay all legitimate expenses, the deficiency shall be paid by the board or its agency.

The board may enter into agreements with licensed meat processing plants to process meat from livestock disposed of by slaughter. The processed meat shall be sold to:

Wyoming state institutions or to nonprofit organizations for no more than the board’s cost for disposal, processing and delivery; or

For profit entities at market cost for the processed meat.

History.

Laws 1913, ch. 125, § 2; C.S. 1920, § 3180; R.S. 1931, § 67-402; C.S. 1945, § 56-1802; Laws 1951, ch. 96, § 1; 1953, ch. 40, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-500; Laws 1961, ch. 46, § 51; W.S. 1977, § 11-30-103; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2010, ch. 80, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (a), deleted “at a total expense of not more than fifty cents ($.50) per day” following “after the inspection,” substituted “be disposed of” for “sent to the most feasible convenient public market designated by the inspector to be sold,” substituted “disposal” for “sales,” and made similar changes; in (b), substituted “proceeds of the disposal” for “proceeds of the sale,” and substituted “deficiency shall be paid” for “deficit shall be paid”; and added (c).

Entry onto land by brand inspector is consistent with statutory
authority. —

There was no Fourth Amendment violation because Wyoming brand inspection statutes, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

11-20-203

and

11-20-205

, authorize the brand inspector to inspect the cattle where they are to be moved from one county to another and the regulatory seizure, specifically authorized by Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

11-24-101

and

11-24-102

, is designed to protect the urgent state interest of preventing trafficking in lost or stolen cattle, such that the brand inspector was not required to obtain a warrant. Stanko v. Mahar, 419 F.3d 1107,

2005 U.S. App. LEXIS 17323

(10th Cir. Wyo. 2005).

§ 11-24-103.
Taking up estrays; penalties.

Any person who takes
up or retains possession of any estray without the owner’s knowledge
or consent, or who in any manner restrains from liberty for the purpose
of using or making use of any estray without the knowledge and consent
of the owner shall be punished as provided
in W.S.

11-1-103

.

History.

Laws 1913, ch. 125, § 3; C.S. 1920, § 3181; R.S. 1931, § 67-403; C.S. 1945, § 56-1803; W.S. 1957, § 11-501; W.S. 1977, §

11-30-104

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2013 ch. 47, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013 deleted “, is guilty of a misdemeanor and” following “consent of the owner,” and substituted punished as provided in W.S.

11-1-103

for “fined not less than ten dollars ($10.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100.00), imprisoned for not exceeding sixty (60) days not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisoned for not more than six (6) months, or both.”

Repealing clauses. —

Section 11, ch. 125, Laws 1913, repealed §§ 2670 to 2676, 2678 and 2679, ch. 177, C.S. 1910.

§ 11-24-104.
Stallions and jacks generally.

If any horse or ass not
gelded, two (2) years old or upwards, is found running at large, it
is lawful for any person to take up the horse or ass and give notice
to the owner or keeper if known. If the owner or keeper does not appear
within six (6) days thereafter and pay expenses incurred for the feed and care of the animal to the person possessing the animal, the person shall advertise
the horse or ass and the same proceedings shall be had as provided
in the case of estray animals, or the person possessing the animal
may after the expiration of thirty (30) days from the time of advertising,
geld or have the horse or ass gelded, at the risk and expense of the
owner, except when the horse or ass is in the owner’s herd, or in
care of the owner’s herder. The owner
of the horse or ass shall be liable for any damages caused by the
animal to property or other livestock.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 46, § 11; R.S. 1887, § 4180; R.S. 1899, § 2072; C.S. 1910, § 2680; C.S. 1920, § 3189; R.S. 1931, § 67-411; C.S. 1945, § 56-1811; W.S. 1957, § 11-502; W.S. 1977, §

11-30-105

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1981, ch. 98, § 2; 2013 ch. 47, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013 substituted “expenses incurred for the feed and care of the animal” for “thirty dollars ($30.00)” following “thereafter and pay,” and added the last sentence.

§ 11-24-105.
Unclaimed horses; permit for gathering; disposal.

Any person desiring to gather unclaimed horses from the ranges within Wyoming shall obtain a permit from the livestock board, except as provided in subsection (e) of this section. The permit applicant shall submit with the permit application written permission to access the range whereon the unclaimed horses are to be gathered from the person who has ownership or control of the surface rights of that range. The form of the permit shall be prescribed by the board.

If after an inspection under subsection (c) or (e) of this section, the rightful owner cannot be found, or when found, refuses or fails to pay the charges for feed and care of the estray, the unclaimed horses shall be disposed of by the board under the laws pertaining to estrays.

The permit and the unclaimed horses shall be presented to an inspector within the county in which they were gathered without unnecessary delay for determination of ownership.

The permittee shall be responsible for all expenses associated with gathering, feed and care of the unclaimed horses until an inspection has occurred.

A permit is not required for any person desiring to gather unclaimed horses located on private land on which the person has ownership or control of the surface rights. A person who has gathered unclaimed horses on private land on which he has ownership or control of the surface rights shall present the unclaimed horses to an inspector within the county in which they were gathered without unnecessary delay for determination of ownership and shall be responsible for all expenses associated with the gather and feed and care of the unclaimed horses until an inspection has occurred.

Any horse claimed by the United States bureau of land management as belonging to a wild horse management unit is excluded from this section.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 173, §§ 2, 3; W.S. 1957, §§ 11-503, 11-504; Laws 1961, ch. 46, § 52; W.S. 1977, §§

11-30-106

,

11-30-107

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2013 ch. 47, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, rewrote (a) and (b); and added (c) through (f).

§ 11-24-106.
Unclaimed horses; penalties.

Any person, firm or corporation
violating any provision of W.S.

11-24-105

shall be punished as provided in W.S.

11-1-103

.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 173, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 11-505; W.S. 1977, §

11-30-108

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1981, ch. 98, § 2.

§ 11-24-107.
Liability for death.

If any estray dies while
in the possession of the person taking it up, he is not liable for
the loss unless its death was the result of mistreatment or willful
neglect.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 46, § 12; R.S. 1887, § 4181; R.S. 1899, § 2073; C.S. 1910, § 2681; C.S. 1920, § 3190; R.S. 1931, § 67-412; C.S. 1945, § 56-1812; W.S. 1957, § 11-506; W.S. 1977, §

11-30-109

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-24-108.
Stock at large or picketed on public highways; penalties for
violations; impoundment and disposition; fees; proceeds from disposition
thereof; removal of dead or injured animals.

No owner or person having custody or charge of livestock shall permit the livestock to run at large in any fenced public highways in Wyoming as defined in W.S.

31-1-101

. Livestock shall not be picketed on a public highway right-of-way from one (1) hour before sundown to one (1) hour after sunrise. If livestock are picketed on a public highway and escape, the owner or person having custody or charge of the livestock is deemed to have permitted the livestock to run at large in violation of this section. No livestock shall be picketed on an interstate or national defense highway as defined in W.S. 31-18-801(a)(xvi).

Any person or corporation violating this section shall be fined not less than two hundred dollars ($200.00) nor more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) and in addition shall pay all damage done by the livestock. The provisions of this section do not apply to livestock drifting into lanes or fenced roads in going to or returning from their accustomed ranges.

Any sheriff, deputy sheriff, livestock brand inspector, or officer or trooper of the Wyoming highway patrol, after notification to the owner of livestock described in subsection (a) of this section, if known, shall within four (4) hours remove the livestock from the public highway, impound the same in the nearest convenient place where feed and water are available and immediately notify the owner, if known, of the action. If ownership is not known, the impounding officer shall report his action to an inspector. The inspector shall make a diligent effort to ascertain ownership of the impounded livestock, and for this purpose may hold the livestock not more than ten (10) days. If unable to determine ownership, the inspector shall dispose of the impounded livestock. Reasonable transportation and disposal expenses shall be paid from the proceeds of the disposal, if any.

A removal fee of not to exceed twenty dollars ($20.00) per head shall be allowed for the expense incurred in removing livestock from any public highway and an impounding fee for expenses incurred for the feed and care of the animal shall be allowed the person responsible for feed and care of the livestock removed. The inspector is responsible for collection and payment to the rightful claimants of removal and impounding fees when impounded livestock is surrendered to the owner. Upon disposal, the total amount of removal and impounding fees shall be made known to the selling agency at the market or slaughter plant by the inspector and shall constitute a first claim on the net proceeds of the livestock after shipping and disposal expenses have been paid, and shall be forwarded by the selling agency to the claimant.

Should the proceeds of the disposition of any impounded animal be insufficient to pay all legitimate shipping and disposal expenses and the removal and impounding fees approved by the inspector, the deficiency shall be paid by the board or its agency.

The net proceeds, if any, from the disposition of the impounded livestock after deduction of removal, impounding, trucking and disposal expenses, shall be forwarded to the estray account of the board. The board shall hold the proceeds until paid to the rightful owner of the livestock or otherwise disposed of according to law.

A peace officer may remove, destroy or otherwise dispose of an animal injured on a state highway after a reasonable attempt to locate the owner of a salvageable animal or a game warden in the case of a wild animal. If reasonably possible, the peace officer shall contact the brand inspector before removing, destroying or disposing of livestock. The carcass of an animal killed on a state highway shall be disposed of by highway maintenance crews. If the owner desires, he may claim the carcass from the maintenance crew. The crews shall report to the inspector brands, marks, tags or other identification. The inspector shall endeavor to establish ownership of the animal and notify the owner in writing or notify the local game warden as may be appropriate. Notwithstanding W.S.

24-1-112

and as part of their duties, any peace officer, inspector or other person acting under this section may, but is not obligated to, attempt to repair any fencing through which an animal has gained improper access to the area in which the animal is found.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 109, §§ 1, 2; C.S. 1920, § 3119; Laws 1921, ch. 108, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 67-230; C.S. 1945, § 56-1813; Laws 1951, ch. 50, § 1; 1955, ch. 15, § 1; Laws 1957, ch. 71, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-507; Laws 1961, ch. 46, § 53; 1975, ch. 68, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

11-30-110

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1981, ch. 98, § 2; ch. 131, § 1; 1999, ch. 3, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2010, ch. 80, § 1; 2013 ch. 47, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2013 ch. 76, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Cross references. —

As to other provisions concerning animals on open range or public places, see §§

11-20-101

to

11-20-125

.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a), substituted “W.S. 31-18-801(a)(xvi)” for “W.S. 31-5-1001(a)(xv).”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (c), substituted “dispose of the impounded livestock” for “ship the impounded livestock to the nearest available market to be sold as estrays,” substituted “disposal expenses” for “sales expenses,” and substituted “of the disposal, if any” for “of the sale”; in (d), substituted “ten dollars ($10.00)” for “five dollars ($5.00),” substituted “Upon disposal” for “Upon shipment to a marked,” inserted “or slaughter plant,” and substituted “disposal expenses” for “sales expenses”; in (e) and (f), substituted “the disposition” for “sale,” and substituted “disposal expenses” for “sales expenses”; and in (e), substituted “deficiency shall be paid” for “deficit shall be paid.”

The 2013 amendments. —

The first 2013 amendment, by ch. 47, §
1, effective July 1, 2013, in (a) substituted “two hundred dollars ($200.00)” for “fifty dollars ($50.00)” following “not less than;” in (d) substituted “twenty dollars ($20.00)” for “ten dollars ($10.00)” following “not to exceed,” substituted “for expenses incurred for the feed and care of the animal” for “of not to exceed ten dollars ($10.00) per day per head” following “impounding fee.”

The second 2013 amendment, by ch. 76, §
1, added the last sentence in (g).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Laws 2013, ch. 76, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo Const. Approved February 27, 2013.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Law in this state differs from common-law rule. —

It is not the law in this state that the owner of cattle is required to confine them, or to prevent them from straying or wandering upon the uninclosed premises of another or in default thereof to respond in damages for their trespasses upon uninclosed lands. That is the common-law rule, but it is and always has been inconsistent with the conditions and customs existing here. Hinkle v. Siltamaki, 361 P.2d 37,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 1961).

Summary judgment inappropriate on issue of negligence. —

Genuine issues of material fact existed where car's passenger was killed as result of collision of car with cattle on paved portion of road; jury should determine what type of precautions ranchers, as reasonable persons under all the circumstances, should have taken to keep their cattle off roadway, and jury must be body to determine from conflicting evidence what precautions were actually taken by the ranchers, and whether cattle were drifting from their summer pastures since the record suggested the ranchers may have been using fenced roadway as a catchpen or corral for their cattle. Schwartz Roitz v. Kidman, 913 P.2d 431,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1996).

Summary judgment was improperly granted in a negligence case arising from a motor vehicle accident involving a cow roaming on a highway, because there was a genuine issue of material fact as to whether this section was violated when the cow escaped from a fence that was either damaged or unsecured. There was a conflict in the testimony regarding the cause of the opening in the fence holding the cow.
Hincks v. Walton Ranch Co., 2007 WY 12, 150 P.3d 669,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 2007).

Protection of public road users subject to exception as to
wandering range cattle. —

While this section was probably inspired mostly for protection of users of the public ways, and it evidences the lawmakers' alertness to give at least some protection against hazards which accompany use of the public's roads, yet, at the same time, special exception from this section was made in favor of range cattle (now any livestock going to or returning from accustomed ranges) drifting into such public lanes or fenced roads. Chicago & N. W. R.R. v. Bishop, 390 P.2d 731,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 1964).

Proof of knowledge, consent or willfulness necessary for conviction.
—

A statute making it unlawful for an owner of livestock “to permit” them to run at large implies knowledge, consent and willfulness on the part of the owner or such negligent conduct as is equivalent thereto, so that the proof of one of these elements is essential either to a conviction or an assessment of damages growing out of a violation. Hinkle v. Siltamaki, 361 P.2d 37,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 1961).

Horse's mere presence on highway not violation. —

Where the plaintiff truck driver, whose vehicle collided with the defendant's horse on a fenced public highway, failed to present any evidence of the defendant's negligence, the mere presence of the horse on the highway failed to establish a violation of this section. Nylen v. Dayton, 770 P.2d 1112,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 1989).

Applied

in

Neal v. Wailes, 346 P.2d 132 (Wyo. 1959); Hill v. Park County ex rel. Bd. of County Comm'rs, 856 P.2d 456,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 1993).

Quoted

in

Gilliland v. Steinhoefel, 521 P.2d 1350,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 205

(Wyo. 1974).

Stated

in

Ellsworth Bros. v. Crook, 406 P.2d 520,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1965).

§ 11-24-109.
Record to be kept of estrays found in shipments in transit of cattle
or horses.

All inspectors shall
keep a record of all estrays found in any shipment of cattle or horses
in transit from this state, and shall take a receipt for the estrays
from the shipper, or in default of a receipt, shall take the estray
from the shipment, giving the shipper a receipt for the estrays on
behalf of the livestock board.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 33, § 25; R.S. 1899, § 2053; C.S. 1910, § 2661; C.S. 1920, § 3158; R.S. 1931, § 67-506; C.S. 1945, § 56-1814; W.S. 1957, § 11-508; W.S. 1977, §

11-30-111

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Proof of affidavit. —

Secretary of livestock board may, in his discretion, require proof in corroboration of a claimant's affidavit, in addition to that required by statute for receiving payment of proceeds from sale of estrays. State ex rel. Foote v. Board of Live-Stock Comm'rs, 4 Wyo. 126, 32 P. 114,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1893).

§ 11-24-110.
Monthly report of inspector; board to keep public record.

The inspector shall make
a report every thirty (30) days of all estrays to the livestock
board, giving a description of the estrays, stating any brands or
other marks by which the estrays may be identified. The board shall
keep a record of all estrays reported, which shall at all times be
open to the public for inspection.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 33, § 25; R.S. 1899, § 2054; C.S. 1910, § 2662; C.S. 1920, § 3159; R.S. 1931, § 67-507; C.S. 1945, § 56-1815; W.S. 1957, § 11-509; W.S. 1977, §

11-30-112

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2013 ch. 47, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, deleted “not otherwise reported” following “thirty (30) days of all estrays.”

§ 11-24-111.
Disposition
of proceeds; remission to board.

All persons shipping
estrays shall immediately remit to the livestock board the proceeds
received for each and every estray disposed of, a receipt for which
was given to an inspector. If any inspector sells an estray from this
state, he shall immediately remit the proceeds to the livestock board.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 33, § 26; R.S. 1899, § 2039; C.S. 1910, § 2647; C.S. 1920, § 3144; R.S. 1931, § 67-120; C.S. 1945, § 56-1816; W.S. 1957, § 11-510; W.S. 1977, §

11-30-113

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2010, ch. 80, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “every estray disposed of” for “every estray sold.”

§ 11-24-112.
Disposition of proceeds; payment to owner on proof of ownership;
unclaimed proceeds generally.

If the lawful owner of
any estray disposed of is found within one (1) year after the end of the calendar year in which disposal
of the estray occurred,
the net amount received from the disposal shall be paid to the owner
upon his proving ownership to the satisfaction of the board or agency.
If at the end of one (1) year after the
end of the calendar year in which disposal of the estray occurred, the proceeds from the disposal of any estray remains unclaimed,
the proceeds shall be disposed of as provided by law.

History.

Laws 1913, ch. 125, § 7; C.S. 1920, § 3185; R.S. 1931, § 67-407; C.S. 1945, § 56-1807; Laws 1951, ch. 96, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 11-512; W.S. 1977, §

11-30-114

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2010, ch. 80, § 1; 2013 ch. 47, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Cross references. —

As to disposition of fees and moneys collected by the Wyoming livestock board, see §

11-18-109

.

As to disposition of unclaimed proceeds from sales of estrays to state treasurer to credit of inspection account within the earmarked revenue fund, see §

11-24-115

.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “any estray disposed of” for “any estray sold,” substituted “the disposal of” for “sale,” and substituted “the disposal” for “the sale less one dollar ($1.00) for each estray, to be retained by the livestock board.”

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “end of the calendar year in which” following “one (1) year after the,” added “occurred” following “the estray,” and added “after the end of the calendar year in which disposal of the estray occurred,” following “one (1) year.”

Repealing clauses. —

Section 11, ch. 125, Laws 1913, repealed §§ 2670 to 2676, 2678 and 2679, ch. 177, C.S. 1910.

Cited

in

Stanko v. Mahar, 419 F.3d 1107, 2005 U.S. App. LEXIS 17323 (2005).

§ 11-24-113.
When shipping prohibited.

It is unlawful for any
person to drive or ship, or cause to be driven or shipped, or to consign
or cause to be consigned, without authority from the owner, any estray
from any place within this state, except through or to a point or
place where an inspector or inspectors are located by the livestock
board.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 33, § 34; R.S. 1899, § 2047; C.S. 1910, § 2655; C.S. 1920, § 3152; R.S. 1931, § 67-128; C.S. 1945, § 56-1822; W.S. 1957, § 11-513; W.S. 1977, §

11-30-115

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-24-114.
Publication of list of unclaimed estrays.

The executive officer of the livestock board shall annually, during the last week of December, send two (2) lists of unclaimed estrays for which he has received payments, to the county clerk of each county, who shall post one (1) copy in a conspicuous place in the courthouse and place one (1) copy on file in his office. The executive officer shall also cause to be published in a newspaper of general circulation in each county from which any estray included in the list was shipped, a notice to the public that the list of estrays is available for examination.

In addition to the notice under subsection (a) of this section, not less than once each month the livestock board shall ensure that if a new estray is taken up notice is posted at the courthouse in the county in which the estray was taken and at each livestock market. The notice under this subsection shall include the location recovered from and the name of the inspector.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 33, § 28; R.S. 1899, § 2041; C.S. 1910, § 2649; Laws 1917, ch. 82, § 1; 1919, ch. 66, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 3146; R.S. 1931, § 67-122; C.S. 1945, § 56-1818; Laws 1951, ch. 96, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 11-514; W.S. 1977, § 11-30-116; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2013 ch. 47, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Cross references. —

As to publication of notices required by law, see §§

1-6-201

to

1-6-204

.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013 added (b).

§ 11-24-115.
Disposition
of unclaimed proceeds to state treasurer to credit of inspection account.

On the first Monday in
January of each year, all estray monies remaining unclaimed for more
than one (1) year after the publication of the notices of posting
of lists of unclaimed estrays, shall be paid to the treasurer of the
state, and be placed to the credit of the inspection account.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 33, § 30; R.S. 1899, § 2043; C.S. 1910, § 2651; C.S. 1920, § 3148; Laws 1921, ch. 4, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 67-124; C.S. 1945, § 56-1820; Laws 1951, ch. 96, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 11-515; Laws 1961, ch. 46, § 54; 1973, ch. 245, § 3; W.S. 1977, § 11-30-117; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to disposition of proceeds from sales of estrays, see §§

11-24-111

and

11-24-112

.

The 2005 amendment

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “within the earmarked revenue fund” at the end.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”